California statutes. Water Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75613.

The ground water charge is payable to the district on or before the last date upon which the water production statement is required to be filed and is computed by multiplying the production in acre-feet of water for each classification as disclosed in the statement by the ground water charge for each classification of water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75614.

Whenever any water-producing facility in an affected zone is permanently abandoned, the operator thereof shall give written notice of such abandonment to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75615.

If any operator of a water-producing facility fails to pay the ground water charge when due, the district shall charge interest at the rate of one percent (1%) each month on the delinquent amount of the ground water charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75616.

If any operator of a water-producing facility fails to register the water-producing facility, or fails to file the water production statements as required by this article, the district shall, in addition to charging interest as provided in Section 75615, assess a penalty charge against such operator in an amount of 10 percent of the amount found by the district to be due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75617.

The board may, at the time of fixing the ground water charge, establish a method or methods to be used in computing the amount of water produced from a water-producing facility which is not measured by a measuring device.

Such methods may be based upon any or all or a combination of the following criteria:

(a) The size of water-producing facility discharge opening.

(b) The area served by the water-producing facility.

(c) The number of persons served by the water-producing facility.

(d) The use of land served by the water-producing facility.

(e) The crops grown on land served by the water-producing facility.

(f) Any other criteria which may be used to determine with reasonable accuracy the amount of water produced from a water-producing facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75618.

Upon good cause shown, an amended statement of water production may be filed or a correction of the records may be made at any time prior to the final date for filing the next semiannual water production statement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75619.

If the district has probable cause to believe that the production of water from any water-producing facility is in excess of that disclosed by the sworn statements covering such water-producing facility, or if no statements are filed covering any water-producing facility, the district may cause an investigation and report to be made concerning the production of water from such water-producing facility.

The district may fix the amount of water production from such water-producing facility at an amount not to exceed the maximum production capacity of such water-producing facility; provided, however, that where a water-measuring device is permanently attached thereto, the record of production, as disclosed by such water-measuring device, shall be presumed to be accurate and the burden is upon the district to establish to the contrary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75620.

After the determination has been made by the district pursuant to Section 75619, a written notice thereof shall be mailed to the person operating the water-producing facility at his address as shown by the district’s records.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75621.

A determination made by the district pursuant to Section 75619 shall be conclusive on all persons having an interest in the water-producing facility involved, and the ground water charge, and the interest and penalties thereon, shall be paid forthwith, unless any such person files with the board, within 10 days after the mailing of the notice of the determination, a written protest setting forth the ground or grounds for protesting the amount of production so fixed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75622.

Upon the filing of a protest, the board shall hold a hearing, at which time the total amount of the water production and the ground water charge thereon shall be determined. Such determination shall be conclusive if based upon substantial evidence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75623.

A notice of the hearing shall be mailed to the protestant at least 10 days before the date fixed for the hearing.

Notice of the determination by the board at the hearing shall be mailed to each protestant, who shall have 10 days from the date of mailing to pay the ground water charge, and the interest and penalties thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75624.

Notice as required in Sections 75620 and 75623 shall be given by deposit thereof in any postal facility regularly maintained by the government of the United States in a sealed envelope with postage paid, addressed to the person on whom it is served at his name and address as disclosed by the records of the district. The service is complete at the time of deposit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Court Actions [75630. - 75633.]

75630.

The superior court of the county in which a water-producing facility within the district lies may issue a temporary restraining order upon the filing by the district of a petition or complaint setting forth that the person named therein as defendant is the operator of a water-producing facility which has not been registered with the district, or that such defendant is delinquent in the payment of a ground water charge.

Such temporary restraining order shall be returnable to the court on or before 10 days after its issuance.

Service of process is completed by posting a copy of the summons and complaint upon the water-producing facility or the parcel of land upon which it is located and by personal service upon the named defendant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75631.

The court in such action may issue and grant an injunction restraining and prohibiting the named defendant from the operation of any water-producing facility when it is established at the hearing that the defendant has failed to register such water-producing facility with the district or that the defendant is delinquent in payment of ground water charges thereon.

The court may provide that the injunction so made and issued shall be stayed for a period not to exceed 10 days to permit the defendant to register the water-producing facility or to pay the delinquent ground water charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75632.

The right to proceed for injunctive relief granted by this article is an additional right to those which may be provided elsewhere in this division or otherwise allowed by law. The procedure provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, regarding injunctions, shall be followed except insofar as it is otherwise provided in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 411.)
-------------------------------------------

75633.

The district may bring a suit in any court having jurisdiction against any operator of a water-producing facility within the district for the collection of any delinquent groundwater charge. The court may, in addition to allowing recovery of costs to the district as allowed by law, fix and allow as part of the judgment interest and penalties as provided in Sections 75615 and 75616.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 412.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. United Water Conservation District [75634. - 75638.]

75634.

For the purposes of this article, “district” means the United Water Conservation District.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 294, Sec. 1.   (AB 552)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

75634.5.

For the purpose of investigating compliance with any provisions of this division or any district ordinance, the district may inspect any water-producing facility within the boundaries of the district. The district shall give notice to the operator by certified mail not less than 15 days in advance of the scheduled inspection. The inspection shall be made with the consent of the operator of the water-producing facility or, if consent is refused, with a warrant duly issued pursuant to Title 13 (commencing with Section 1822.50) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 294, Sec. 1.   (AB 552)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

75635.

In addition to those remedies set forth in Sections 75615 and 75616, if the operator of a water-producing facility fails to file a water production statement or pay delinquent groundwater charges when due, the district may assess an administrative charge to recover the cost of collection of delinquent unpaid charges. The board may provide by ordinance that in excusable or justifiable circumstances, the administrative charge may be reduced or waived.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 294, Sec. 1.   (AB 552)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

75635.5.

(a) In addition to the district’s right to bring a suit against any operator of a water-producing facility within the district for the collection of any delinquent groundwater charges, interest, and penalties as provided in Section 75633, as a provisional remedy in the action the district may seek a writ of attachment against the property of any named defendant in the suit and the district shall not be required to furnish a bond or other undertaking as provided in The Attachment Law (Title 6.5 (commencing with Section 481.010) of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure).

(b) The
 district may recover costs and administrative charges in a suit against any operator of a water-producing facility within the district for the collection of any delinquent groundwater charges, interest, and penalties in accordance with Section 75633 or as otherwise provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 294, Sec. 1.   (AB 552)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

75636.

In accordance with Section 75614, when an operator provides notice to the district of the abandonment of a water-producing facility or a water-producing facility is in fact abandoned, the district may affix seals to the facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 294, Sec. 1.   (AB 552)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

75637.

(a) As an alternative to bringing suit pursuant to Section 75633, the district may collect any delinquent groundwater charges and any interest, penalties, costs, and administrative charges. The collection shall be in the same manner as would be applicable to the collection of delinquent assessments, water charges, or tolls. 

(b) As an additional remedy, the district may order, after a public hearing, an operator to cease extraction of groundwater from a water-producing facility until all delinquent fees and charges are paid. The district shall give notice to the operator by certified mail not less than 15 days in advance of the public hearing.

(c) The remedies specified in this section for the collection and enforcement of fees are cumulative, and the district may pursue them alternatively or use them consecutively as determined by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 294, Sec. 1.   (AB 552)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

75637.5.

Following the issuance of an injunction restraining the operation of a water-producing facility in accordance with Section 75631 and the termination of any stay, as a condition of allowing future operation of the facility, the district may require the operator to post a cash deposit or bond with the district providing future assurance of payment of delinquent groundwater charges. The district may require the cash deposit or bond to be in an amount equal to the amount of delinquent groundwater charges due for the preceding six-month period.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 294, Sec. 1.   (AB 552)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

75638.

The remedies specified in this article are cumulative and the district may pursue them alternatively or use them concurrently as determined by the board of directors of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 294, Sec. 1.   (AB 552)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Crimes [75640. - 75642.]

75640.

Any person who fails to register a water-producing facility, as required by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 75540) of this part, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75641.

Any person who produces water from any water-producing facility required to be registered pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 75540) of this part is guilty of a misdemeanor unless such facility has been registered with the district within the time required by Chapter 2 and, if required by the board, has a water-measuring device affixed thereto capable of registering the accumulated amount of water produced therefrom.

Each day of operation in violation of this section shall constitute a separate offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75642.

Any person who injures, alters, removes, resets, adjusts, manipulates, obstructs, or in any manner interferes or tampers with, or procures or causes or directs any person to injure, alter, remove, reset, adjust, manipulate, obstruct, or in any manner interfere or tamper with, any water-measuring device affixed to any water-producing facility as required by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 75540) of this part, so as to cause such device to improperly or inaccurately measure and record the water production, or any person who, with intent to evade any provision or requirement of this part, files with the district any false or fraudulent water production statement, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 10. CHANGES IN ORGANIZATION [75750. - 76061.]



  CHAPTER 1. Exclusion [75750. - 75835.]



  ARTICLE 1. In General [75750. - 75751.]

75750.

The boundaries of a district may be changed and tracts of land may be excluded therefrom, in the manner prescribed in this chapter.

Neither such change of the boundaries of the district nor such exclusion of lands from the district shall impair or affect its organization, or its right in or to property, or any of its rights or privileges of whatever kind or nature; nor shall it affect, impair, or discharge any contract, obligation, lien, or charge for or upon which the district was or may become liable or chargeable, had such change of its boundaries not been made, or had not such land been excluded from the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75751.

A guardian, executor, or an administrator of an estate, who is appointed as such under the laws of this state, and who, as such guardian, executor, or administrator, is entitled to the possession of the lands belonging to the estate which he represents, may, on behalf of his ward or the estate which he represents, upon being authorized by the proper court, sign and acknowledge a petition for exclusion of lands, and may show cause, as provided in this chapter, why the boundaries of the district should not be changed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Petition and Notice [75760. - 75764.]

75760.

The owner or owners in fee of one or more tracts of land which constitute a portion of a district and which severally or in their entirety are contiguous to the exterior boundaries of the district may jointly or severally file with the board a petition, praying that such tract or tracts, and any other tracts contiguous thereto, be excluded from the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75761.

The petition for exclusion of lands shall state the grounds and reasons upon which it is claimed that the lands should be excluded. The petition shall describe the boundaries of the lands, and shall describe the lands of the petitioner or petitioners which are included within such boundaries. The description of such lands need not be more particular or certain than is required when the lands are entered in the assessment book by the county assessor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75762.

The petition for exclusion of lands shall be acknowledged in the manner and form as is required in the case of conveyance of land, and the acknowledgment shall have the same force and effect as evidence as the acknowledgment of such a conveyance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75763.

The secretary shall cause a notice of the filing of the petition for exclusion of lands to be published for at least once a week for two weeks in some newspaper published in the county where the office of the board is situated. If any portion of the territory asked to be excluded lies within another county or counties, the notice shall be so published in a newspaper published within each of such counties; or if no newspaper is published therein, the notice shall be posted for the same time in at least three public places in the district. In case of the posting of such notices, one of such notices shall be so posted on the lands proposed to be excluded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75764.

The notice of the filing of the petition for exclusion of lands shall state the filing of the petition, the names of the petitioners, a description of the lands mentioned in the petition, and the prayer of the petition. It shall notify all persons interested in, or who may be affected by, the change of the boundaries of the district, to appear at the office of the board at a time named in the notice and show cause, in writing, if any they have, why the change of the boundaries of the district, as proposed in the petition, should not be made. The time to be specified in the notice at which they shall be required to show cause shall be the regular meeting of the board next after the expiration of the time for the publication of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Hearing and Order [75780. - 75784.]

75780.

The board, at the time and place mentioned in the notice of the filing of the petition for exclusion of lands, or at the time or times to which the hearing of the petition may be adjourned, shall proceed to hear the petition, all evidence or proofs that are introduced by or on behalf of the petitioner or petitioners, and all objections to the petition that are presented in writing by any person showing cause why the change of boundaries should not be made, and all evidence and proofs that are introduced in support of such objections. Such evidence shall be taken down in shorthand, and a record made thereof and filed with the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75781.

The failure of any person interested in the district, other than the holders of bonds thereof outstanding at the time of the filing of the petition for exclusion of lands, to show cause, in writing, why the tract or tracts of land mentioned in the petition should not be excluded from the district shall be deemed and taken as an assent by him to the exclusion of such tract or tracts of land, or any part thereof, from the district; and the filing of such petition shall be deemed and taken as an assent by each petitioner to the exclusion from the district of the lands mentioned in the petition, or any part thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75782.

The expenses of giving the notice of the filing of the petition for exclusion of lands and of the proceedings on the petition shall be paid by the person or persons filing the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75783.

If, upon the hearing of the petition for exclusion of lands, no evidence or proofs in support thereof are introduced, or if the evidence fails to sustain the petition, or if the board deems it not for the best interest of the district that the lands, or some portion thereof, mentioned in the petition, should be excluded from the district, the board shall order that the petition be denied as to such lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75784.

If the board deems it for the best interest of the district that the lands mentioned in the petition for exclusion of lands, or some portion thereof, be excluded from the district, and if no person interested in the district shows cause in writing why such lands or some portion thereof, should not be excluded from the district, or if, having shown cause, withdraws his objections, or upon the hearing fails to establish such objections as he may have made, the board may, by unanimous vote of all of its members, make an order that the lands mentioned and described in the petition, or some defined portion thereof, be excluded from said district.

The board shall order the exclusion of all lands petitioned to be excluded from the district which, in the judgment of all of its members, will not be benefited by the operations of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Recordation of Change of Boundaries and Filing of Certificate [75800. - 75802.]

75800.

If the board excludes any lands from the district, it shall make an entry in the minutes of the board describing the boundaries of the district, if the exclusion of the lands from the district changes the boundaries of the district, and for that purpose the board may cause a survey to be made of such portions of the district as the board deems necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75801.

A certified copy of the entry in the minutes of the board excluding any land, certified by the president and secretary, shall be filed for record in the recorder’s office of each affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75802.

Upon exclusion of land from the district, the board shall file a certificate with the Secretary of State stating:

(a) The name of the district.

(b) The effective date of the exclusion.

(c) The county or counties in which the district is located, and a description of the land excluded, or reference to a map showing the boundaries of such excluded land, which map shall be attached to the certificate, or reference to the county recorder’s office where a description of such boundaries has been recorded.

If the exclusion order contains all of the information required to be in the certificate, the board may file a copy of the order in lieu of the certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Bondholders’ Assent to Exclusion [75810. - 75813.]

75810.

If there are outstanding bonds of the district at the time of the filing of the petition for exclusion of lands, the holders of such outstanding bonds may give their assent, in writing, to the effect that they severally consent that the lands mentioned in the petition, or such portion thereof as may be excluded from the district by order of the board, may be excluded from the district; and if such lands, or any portion thereof, are thereafter excluded from the district, the lands so excluded shall be released from the lien of such outstanding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75811.

The assent shall be acknowledged by the several holders of the outstanding bonds in the same manner and form as is required in case of a conveyance of land, and the acknowledgment shall have the same force and effect as evidence as the acknowledgment of such conveyance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75812.

The assent shall be filed with the board, and shall be recorded in the minutes of the board; and such minutes, or a copy thereof, certified by the secretary, shall be admissible in evidence, with the same effect as the assent, and such certified copy thereof may be recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county wherein the excluded lands are situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75813.

If the holders of outstanding bonds of the district which are payable from assessments upon real property give their assent, as provided in Section 75810, to the exclusion of lands from the district, the assent shall release all real property which is excluded from the district by virtue of the exclusion of such lands from the lien of such outstanding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Effect of Exclusion [75830. - 75835.]

75830.

A district, notwithstanding the exclusion of lands therefrom, shall be and remain a district as fully, to every intent and purpose, as it would be had no change been made in the boundaries of the district, or had the lands excluded therefrom never constituted a portion of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75831.

Nothing in this division shall, in any manner, operate to release any of the lands excluded from a district from any obligation to pay, or from any lien thereon of, any valid outstanding bonds or other indebtedness of the district at the time of the filing of the petition for exclusion of such lands, but upon the contrary, such lands shall be held subject to such lien and answerable and chargeable for and with the payment and discharge of all of such outstanding obligations at the time of the filing of the petition for exclusion, as fully as though such petition were never filed and the order of exclusion never made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75832.

For the purpose of discharging the outstanding indebtedness at the time of the filing of the petition for exclusion of lands, the lands excluded shall be deemed and considered as part of the district the same as though the petition for its exclusion had never been filed or the order of exclusion never made.

All provisions which may have been resorted to to compel the payment by such lands of their quota or portion of such outstanding obligations had such exclusion never been accomplished, may, notwithstanding such exclusion, be resorted to to compel and enforce the payment on the part of such lands of their quota or portion of such outstanding obligations for which they are liable.

Such lands shall not be held answerable or chargeable for any obligation of any nature or kind whatever incurred after the filing with the board of the petition for the exclusion of such lands from the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75833.

The provisions of Sections 75831 and 75832 shall not apply to any outstanding bonds, the holders of which have assented to the exclusion of the lands from the district, as provided in Article 5 (commencing with Section 75810) of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75834.

If any of the outstanding bonds are payable from assessments upon all real property in the district, any real property excluded from the district by virtue of the exclusion of lands from said district shall, notwithstanding such exclusion, be considered a part of such district for the purpose of discharging such outstanding bonded indebtedness and shall be and remain liable to be taxed to pay the principal of and interest on such outstanding bonded indebtedness until such outstanding bonded indebtedness and the interest thereon is fully paid; except that the provisions of this section shall not apply to any outstanding bonds, the holders of which have assented to the exclusion of such lands from the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75835.

If the land excluded from any district embraces the greater portion of any division or divisions of such district, the office of director for such division or divisions shall become and be vacant at the expiration of 10 days from the final order of the board excluding such lands. Such vacancy or vacancies shall be filled pursuant to Section 1780 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1059.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Inclusion [75850. - 75939.]



  ARTICLE 1. In General [75850. - 75852.]

75850.

The boundaries of a district may be changed to include additional land within the district as provided in this chapter, and the inclusion within a district of any land not contiguous thereto shall be deemed to effect a change of the boundaries of the district. No such change in the boundaries of a district shall impair or affect its organization, or its right in or to property, or any of its rights or privileges of whatsoever kind or nature; nor shall it affect, impair, or discharge any contract, obligation, lien, or charge for or upon which the district was or might become liable or chargeable had such change of its boundaries not been made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75851.

When a district is the sole owner of any tract of land not within the boundaries of the district, the board, upon determining that the inclusion of that land will be for the best interests of the district, may by resolution declare that such land shall be included in the district. The inclusion of such land within the district is effective immediately upon the adoption of the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75852.

A guardian, executor, or administrator of an estate, who is appointed as such under the laws of this state, and who, as such guardian, executor, or administrator, is entitled to the possession of the lands belonging to the estate which he represents, may, on behalf of his ward or the estate which he represents, upon being authorized by the proper court, sign and acknowledge petition for the inclusion of lands, and may show cause, as provided in this chapter, why the boundaries of the district should not be changed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Petition and Notice [75860. - 75864.]

75860.

The holder of title or evidence of title, to any tract of land, or if there is more than one holder of title or evidence of title to such tract, the majority of such holders who are also the holders of title or evidence of title to at least one-half of the area of such land, may file in the office of the board a petition praying that such tract of land be included within the district.

A petitioner who is the owner of an undivided interest in such land, or any of it, shall be deemed the owner of such proportion of the area of the land in which he has an interest as his interest bears to the whole of such land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75861.

Each signature to the petition for inclusion of lands shall be acknowledged or proved as provided by law for signatures to an instrument to entitle it to be recorded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75862.

The secretary shall cause a notice of the filing of the petition for inclusion of lands to be given and published in the same manner and for the same time as notices of elections for the issuance of bonds are required to be given and published.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75863.

The notice of the filing of the petition for inclusion of lands shall state the purpose of the petition, describe the boundaries of the tract of land proposed to be included, and give the names of the petitioners. It shall also notify all persons interested in, or who may be affected by, the proposed inclusion of the land within the district to appear at the office of the board at a time named in the notice for the hearing of the petition and objections thereto and show cause, in writing, if any they have, why the land or any of it should not be included as proposed in the petition. The time to be specified in the notice for the hearing shall be the regular meeting of the board next after the expiration of the time for the publication of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75864.

The petitioners shall advance to the secretary sufficient money to pay for the publication of the notice of the filing of the petition for the inclusion of lands, which shall be refunded to the petitioners if the petition is granted in whole or in part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Hearing and Order [75880. - 75887.]

75880.

The board, at the time and place mentioned in the notice of the filing of the petition for inclusion of lands, or at the time or times to which the hearing of the petition may be postponed, shall proceed to hear the petition and all the objections thereto presented in writing by any person showing cause why the proposed change of boundaries of the district should not be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75881.

The failure of any person interested in the district, or in the matter of the proposed change of its boundaries, to show cause in writing why the proposed change of boundaries of the district should not be made shall be deemed and taken as an assent by him to the change of the boundaries of the district as prayed for in the petition for the inclusion of lands, or to such a change of such boundaries as will include a part of the lands; and the filing of such petition shall be deemed and taken as an assent on the part of each petitioner to such a change of the boundaries as may include the whole or any portion of the lands described in the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75882.

If the board, after the hearing, determines that the petition for inclusion of lands complies with the requirements of Article 2 (commencing with Section 75860) of this chapter and that the inclusion within the distict of the tract of land described in the petition, or some portion or portions thereof, will be for the best interests of the district, and if no protest against the inclusion of such land is made, or if such protest is made and enough signatures are withdrawn therefrom so that the protest is no longer sufficient, the board shall order the boundaries of the district to be changed so that the tract of land, or such portion or portions thereof as the board deems it for the best interests of the district to include, shall be included in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75883.

If the board determines that only a portion or certain portions of the tract of land described in the petition for inclusion of lands should be included, the petition shall be dismissed unless:

(a) The petitioners include a majority of the holders of title or evidence of title of such portion, or of each of such portions, of the tract, representing also at least one-half the area of such portion, or of each of such portions; or 

(b) Within 60 days from the time such determination is made, there is filed with the board the consent in writing, acknowledged or proved as required in Section 75861, of a majority of the holders of title or evidence of title of such portion, or of each of such portions, of the tract of land, representing also at least one-half of the area of such portion or each of such portions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75884.

The order changing the boundaries shall describe the boundaries of the land included within the district, and if such land adjoins any portion of the district, the order shall also describe that portion of the boundary of the district which coincides with the boundary of the land included. For the purposes of the order, the board may cause a survey to be made of such portions of such boundaries as it deems necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75885.

If more than one petition for the inclusion of land has been presented, the board may in one order include within the district any number of separate tracts of land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75886.

Any public land of the United States may be included within a district, except as may be provided otherwise by federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75887.

The board may require, as a condition precedent to the granting of the petition for inclusion of lands, that the petitioners severally pay to the district such respective sums, as nearly as they can be estimated (the several amounts to be determined by the board), as the petitioners or their predecessors in interest would have been required to pay to the district as assessments had the lands been included in the district at the time the district was originally formed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Election [75900. - 75907.]

75900.
